Idaho, session 2026, H0568.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. IDAHO CODE CLEANUP -- LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent
of the Legislature to ensure that the state laws provided in Idaho Code are
streamlined, up-to-date, and essential for the citizens of Idaho, while best
serving the public health, safety, and welfare. In accordance with the Idaho
Code Cleanup Act, following comprehensive review, the Legislature has iden-
tified the provisions of this act as obsolete, outdated, or unnecessary.
SECTION 2. That the Heading for Chapter 8, Title 38, Idaho Code, be, and
the same is hereby amended to read as follows:
CHAPTER 8
FLOATING TIMBER
SECTION 3. That Section 38-802, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Section 38-803, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. That Section 38-804, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Section 38-805, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 7. That Section 38-806, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 8. That Section 38-807, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 9. That Section 38-1210, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 10. That Chapter 8, Title 58, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 11. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.